Missouri, session 2026, HB2605.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 108.240 and 115.127, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 108.240 and 115.127, to read as follows:
108.240. 1. Before any general obligation bearer bond or general obligation
registered bond, hereafter issued by any county, township, city, town, village or school district
or special road district or fire protection district or by virtue of the provisions of chapters 243,
245, 248, and sections 242.010 to 242.690 for any purpose whatever, shall obtain validity or
be negotiated:
(1) If such bonds are in bearer form, such bonds shall first be presented to the state
auditor, who, other provisions of law notwithstanding, shall certify by manual or facsimile
endorsement of such bonds that all conditions of the laws have been complied with in its
issue, if that be the case, and also that the conditions of the contract, under which they were
ordered to be issued, have also been complied with and the evidence of that fact shall be filed
and preserved by the auditor. The state auditor may endorse bearer bonds with the auditor's
facsimile signature in lieu of manual signature after filing the auditor's manual signature,
certified by the auditor under oath, with the secretary of state; and
(2) If such bonds are in registered form, the proceedings relating to the issuance of
such registered bonds shall first be presented to the state auditor, who shall examine the same
and shall issue a certificate that such proceedings comply with all conditions of the laws, if
that be the case, and also that the conditions of the contract, under which they were ordered to
be issued, have also been complied with, and the evidence of these facts shall be filed and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2605 2
preserved by the auditor. The state auditor shall also maintain the following information: the
name of the issuer of the bonds; the amount thereof; the maturity dates thereof; the interest
rates thereon; and the provisions with respect to prepayment, if any.
2. Such bearer bonds after receiving the said certificate of the auditor as herein
provided and such registered bonds after the issuance of the said certificate as herein provided
shall thereafter be held in every action, suit or proceeding in which their validity is, or may
be, brought into question, prima facie, valid and binding obligations, and in every action
brought to enforce collection of such bonds, the certificate of such auditor, or a duly certified
copy thereof, shall be admitted and received in evidence of the validity of such bonds,
together with the coupons thereto attached if any; provided, the only defense which can be
offered against the validity of such bonds shall be for forgery or fraud. But this section shall
not be construed to give validity to any such bonds as may be issued in excess of the limit
fixed by the constitution, or contrary to its provisions, but all such bonds shall, to the extent of
such excess, be held void; and provided further, that the remedy of injunction shall also lie at
the instance of any taxpayer of the respective county, city, town, village, township or school
district or special road district or fire protection district or drainage district or levy district to
prevent the registration of any bonds, alleged to be illegally issued or funded.
3. For purposes of subsection 1 of this section, once the time period set forth in
section 115.557 has expired, if no election contest has been brought, all conditions of
chapter 115 shall be deemed as having been complied with in the issuance of the bond.
115.127. 1. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section, upon receipt of notice
of a special election to fill a vacancy submitted pursuant to subsection 2 of section 115.125,
the election authority shall cause legal notice of the special election to be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in its jurisdiction. The notice shall include the name of the
officer or agency calling the election, the date and time of the election, the name of the office
to be filled and the date by which candidates must be selected or filed for the office. Within
one week prior to each special election to fill a vacancy held in its jurisdiction, the election
authority shall cause legal notice of the election to be published in two newspapers of
different political faith and general circulation in the jurisdiction. The legal notice shall
include the date and time of the election, the name of the officer or agency calling the election
and a sample ballot. If there is only one newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction,
the notice shall be published in the newspaper within one week prior to the election. If there
are two or more newspapers of general circulation in the jurisdiction, but no two of opposite
political faith, the notice shall be published in any two of the newspapers within one week
prior to the election.
2. Except as provided in subsections 1 and 4 of this section and in sections 115.521,
115.549 and 115.593, the election authority shall cause legal notice of each election held in its

HCS HB 2605 3
jurisdiction to be published. The notice shall be published in two newspapers of different
political faith and qualified pursuant to chapter 493 which are published within the bounds of
the area holding the election. If there is only one so-qualified newspaper, then notice shall be
published in only one newspaper. If there is no newspaper published within the bounds of the
election area, then the notice shall be published in two qualified newspapers of different
political faith serving the area. Notice shall be published twice[, the first publication
occurring in the second week prior to the election, and the second publication occurring]
within [one week] six weeks prior to the election. Each such legal notice shall include the
date and time of the election, the name of the officer or agency calling the election and a
sample ballot; and, unless notice has been given as provided by section 115.129, the second
publication of notice of the election shall include the location of polling places. The election
authority may provide any additional notice of the election it deems desirable.
3. The election authority shall print the official ballot as the same appears on the
sample ballot, and no candidate's name or ballot issue which appears on the sample ballot or
official printed ballot shall be stricken or removed from the ballot except on death of a
candidate or by court order, but in no event shall a candidate or issue be stricken or removed
from the ballot less than eight weeks before the date of the election.
4. In lieu of causing legal notice to be published twice in accordance with any of the
provisions of this chapter, the election authority [in jurisdictions which have less than seven
hundred fifty registered voters and in which no newspaper qualified pursuant to chapter 493 is
published,] may cause legal notice to be mailed [during the second week prior to the election,
by first class mail,] within six weeks prior to the election to each registered voter at the
voter's voting address and published once in one or more newspapers in the county. An
election authority may exclude from this mailing any voter that is designated as an
inactive voter pursuant to section 115.193. All such legal notices shall include the date and
time of the election, the location of the polling place, the name of the officer or agency calling
the election and a sample ballot.
5. If the opening date for filing a declaration of candidacy for any office in a political
subdivision or special district is not required by law or charter, the opening filing date shall be
8:00 a.m., the seventeenth Tuesday prior to the election. If the closing date for filing a
declaration of candidacy for any office in a political subdivision or special district is not
required by law or charter, the closing filing date shall be 5:00 p.m., the fourteenth Tuesday
prior to the election. The political subdivision or special district calling an election shall,
before the seventeenth Tuesday, prior to any election at which offices are to be filled, notify
the general public of the opening filing date, the office or offices to be filled, the proper place
for filing and the closing filing date of the election. Such notification may be accomplished

HCS HB 2605 4
by legal notice published in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the political
subdivision or special district.
6. Except as provided for in sections 115.247 and 115.359, if there is no additional
cost for the printing or reprinting of ballots or if the candidate agrees to pay any printing or
reprinting costs, a candidate who has filed for an office or who has been duly nominated for
an office may, at any time after the certification of the notice of election required in
subsection 1 of section 115.125 but no later than 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Tuesday before the
election, withdraw as a candidate pursuant to a court order, which, except for good cause
shown by the election authority in opposition thereto, shall be freely given upon application
by the candidate to the circuit court of the area of such candidate's residence.
✔